Vermont, session 2025-2026, H299.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 5103 is amended to read:
§ 5103. JURISDICTION
(a) The Family Division of the Superior Court shall have exclusive
jurisdiction over all proceedings concerning a child who is or who is alleged to
be a delinquent child or a child in need of care or supervision brought under
the authority of the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters, except as otherwise
provided in such chapters.
* * *
VT LEG #380968 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.299
2025 Page 2 of 2
(e)(1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Family Division shall
retain jurisdiction over a child or youth subject to a petition when the court
finds by clear and convincing evidence that the child or youth is the victim of:
(A) human trafficking or aggravated human trafficking as defined in
13 V.S.A. § 2652 or 2653;
(B) sexual assault as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 3252(a)(1) or (a)(2);
(C) aggravated sexual assault as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 3253; or
(D) aggravated sexual assault of a child as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 3253a.
(2) The court may hold an evidentiary hearing to determine whether the
child or youth is the victim of the crimes listed in subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380968 v.1